Washington statutes.
RCW 4.100.080

Remedies and compensation exclusive—Admissibility of agreements.

(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the remedies and compensation provided under this chapter shall be exclusive to all other remedies at law and in equity against the state or any political subdivision of the state. As a requirement to making a request for relief under this chapter, the claimant waives any and all other remedies, causes of action, and other forms of relief or compensation against the state, any political subdivision of the state, and their officers, employees, agents, and volunteers related to the claimant's wrongful conviction and imprisonment. This waiver shall also include all state, common law, and federal claims for relief, including claims pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1983. A wrongfully convicted person who elects not to pursue a claim for compensation pursuant to this chapter shall not be precluded from seeking relief through any other existing remedy. The claimant must execute a legal release prior to the payment of any compensation under this chapter. If the release is held invalid for any reason and the claimant is awarded compensation under this chapter and receives a tort award related to his or her wrongful conviction and incarceration, the claimant must reimburse the state for the lesser of:

(a) The amount of the compensation award, excluding the portion awarded pursuant to RCW 4.100.060(5) (c) through (e); or

(b) The amount received by the claimant under the tort award.

(2) A release dismissal agreement, plea agreement, or any similar agreement whereby a prosecutor's office or an agent acting on its behalf agrees to take or refrain from certain action if the accused individual agrees to forgo legal action against the county, the state of Washington, or any political subdivision, is admissible and should be evaluated in light of all the evidence. However, any such agreement is not dispositive of the question of whether the claimant was wrongly convicted or entitled to compensation under this chapter.

[ 2013 c 175 s 8.]